Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 47-1201 to 47-1205 shall be known and may be cited as the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 1.